Skip to content

2nd declension genitive formation

Supreme Overlord edited this page Jun 7, 2026 · 3 revisions

Motivation

Due to the Standard's inconsistent wording, it is not useful as a reference. As such, this page will document the research I did on the 2nd declension nouns' genitive formations. The goal is eventually to have a set of parameters that, given that a noun is in the 2nd declension, can be used to reliably transform nominative forms into genitive forms.

Examining the data that is in the database, these are the patterns I have noticed.

Transformation types

These patterns exhaustively match all valid 2nd declension nouns in the database.

Pattern Name Mutation of nominative
+ e Add -e to Nominative
Palatalization + e Palatalize according to normal rules and add -e
Alternative Palatalization + e Like previous, palatalized normally except ea becomes ei, then add -e
í íoch -> í
aí ach -> aí
íne íon -> íne
ingthe ingt -> ingthe
Syncope + e Syncopate nominative and add -e
Palatalized syncope + e Syncopated, then palatalized normally, then add -e
Alternative Palatalization Syncope + e Like previous, palatalized normally except ea becomes ei, then add -e
Exception Don't follow above rules, but still are 2nd declension. scian, caileann, blocshliabh

General Patterns

  • As noted by the Standard, all of them are feminine, end with consonant in nominative, and end with -e, aí, or í in the genitive. From this point on the change will be noted with respect to the nominative.
  • Nouns ending on slender consonants do not ever undergo any palatalization directly. If there is palatalization done, it is first syncopated.
  • There are some exceptional transformations that don't appear to apply to any other nouns:
    • scian -> scine -- The a is simply dropped
    • caileann -> caille -- The ann is simply dropped
    • blocshliabh -> blocsléibhe -- While the -liabh is changed to -léibhe, note that the shl is also unlenited.
  • There was only one -ingt word in the database, tuirlingt, but the same transformation applies to tarraingt, so I think that is enough to note as its own rule.
  • The vast majority of nouns that end on slender consonants will get +e.
  • If it ends on a slender vowel, it is always i. (Just an Irish thing, perhaps?)

Working rules

There may be more general patterns that I am missing.

Special endings

  • Nouns in the í, aí, íne, and ingthe groups and exceptions will follow those always. Otherwise, generally, the following rules apply.

Slender consonant endings

  • For nouns ending in slender consonants, the Alternative Palatalization Syncope + e rule applies to:
    • obair and all compounds thereof
    • domhain
    • seamair
    • sluasaid
    • fothair
  • Syncope + e applies to:
    • i + [gd]h + i + consonant
    • -short vowel/í + [tfd] + ir
    • some words ending in consonant + il, but there's no reliable way to tell which ones. E.g. scidil -> scidile, but caibidil -> caibidle
    • -inis
    • trilis
  • Almost all other nouns ending in slender consonants, however, simply just get +e.

Broad consonants endings

  • What the standard was trying to say is that only beann and circe are the exceptions where ea is changed to i in monosyllabic nouns. Every other monosyllabic noun ending on ea + consonant is changed to ei.
  • For polysyllabic nouns, the ea may be any of Syncope + e, Palatalized + e, or Palatalized Alternative + e. There does not seem to be any correlation between syllable stress and rule. There are some patterns that apply, that probably need more elaboration later.
  • All nouns ending in broad consonant clusters that are not -ea are just Palatalized + e.

Clone this wiki locally